Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 6. Foreign Professional Corporations

§ 860.
Authority to transact business.

A foreign professional corporation may not transact business in this State until it obtains a certificate of authority from the Secretary of State.

A foreign professional corporation may not obtain a certificate of authority, unless:

its corporate name satisfies the requirements of section 825 of this title;

it is incorporated for one or more of the purposes described in section 821 of this title; and

all of its shareholders, not less than one-half of its directors, and all of its officers, other than its secretary and treasurer (if any), are licensed in one or more states to render a professional service described in its articles of incorporation, except as provided in section 881 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

See note set out under chapter 4 of this title.

§ 861.
Application for certificate of authority.

The application of a foreign professional corporation for a certificate of authority to render professional services in this State must contain the information called for by 11A V.S.A. § 15.03, and, in addition, include a statement that all of its shareholders, not less than one-half of its directors, and all of its officers, other than its secretary and treasurer (if any), are licensed in one or more states to render a professional service described in its articles of incorporation, except as provided in section 881 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 862.
Revocation of certificate of authority.

The Secretary of State may administratively revoke, under 11A V.S.A. §§ 15.30-15.32, the certificate of authority of a foreign professional corporation authorized to transact business in this State if a licensing authority with jurisdiction over a professional service described in the corporation’s articles of incorporation certifies to the Secretary of State that the corporation has violated or is violating a provision of this chapter, and describes the violation in the certificate.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.